Washington statutes.
RCW 43.348.010

Definitions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5455.SL) ***

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Board" means the governing board of the endowment.

(2) "Cancer" means a group of diseases involving unregulated cell growth.

(3) "Cancer patient advocacy organizations" means groups with offices in the state that promote cancer prevention and advocate on behalf of cancer patients.

(4) "Cancer research" means advanced and applied research and development relating to the causes, prevention, and diagnosis of cancer and care of cancer patients including the development of tests, genetic analysis, medications, processes, services, and technologies to optimize cancer therapies and their manufacture and commercialization and includes the costs of recruiting scientists and establishing and equipping research facilities.

(5) "Commercial entity" means a for-profit entity located in the state that develops, manufactures, or sells goods or services relating to cancer prevention or care.

(6) "Committee" means an independent expert scientific review and advisory committee established under RCW 43.348.050.

(7) "Contribution agreement" means any agreement authorized under this chapter in which a private entity or a public entity other than the state agrees to provide to the endowment contributions for the purpose of cancer research, prevention, or care.

(8) "Costs" means the costs and expenses associated with the conduct of research, prevention, and care including, but not limited to, the cost of recruiting and compensating personnel, securing and financing facilities and equipment, and conducting clinical trials.

(9) "Department" means the department of commerce.

(10) "Endowment" means the Andy Hill cancer research endowment.

(11) "Fund" means the Andy Hill cancer research fund created in RCW 43.348.060(1)(b).

(12) "Health care delivery system" means hospitals and clinics providing care to patients in the state.

(13) "Life sciences research" means advanced and applied research and development intended to improve human health, including scientific study of the developing brain and human learning and development, and other areas of scientific research and development vital to the state's economy.

(14) "Prevention" means measures to prevent the development and progression of cancer, including education, vaccinations, and screening processes and technologies, and to reduce the risk of cancer.

(15) "Program" means the Andy Hill cancer research endowment program created in RCW 43.348.040.

(16) "Program administrator" means a private nonprofit corporation qualified as a tax-exempt entity under 26 U.S.C. Sec. 501(c)(3) of the federal internal revenue code, with expertise in conducting or managing research granting activities, funds, or organizations.

[ 2018 c 4 s 1; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 34 s 2.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: The definitions in this section have been alphabetized pursuant to RCW 1.08.015(2)(k).